Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.230

Security freeze—Protected consumers—Placement and removal—Fees—Exceptions.

(1) A consumer reporting agency shall place a security freeze for a protected consumer if:

(a) The consumer reporting agency receives a request from the protected consumer's representative for the placement of the security freeze under this section; and

(b) The protected consumer's representative:

(i) Submits the request to the consumer reporting agency at the address or other point of contact and in the manner specified by the consumer reporting agency;

(ii) Provides to the consumer reporting agency sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer and the representative; and

(iii) Provides to the consumer reporting agency sufficient proof of authority to act on behalf of the protected consumer.

(2) If a consumer reporting agency does not have a file pertaining to a protected consumer when the consumer reporting agency receives a request under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the consumer reporting agency shall create a record for the protected consumer.

(3) Within thirty days after receiving a request that meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, a consumer reporting agency shall place a security freeze for the protected consumer.

(4) Unless a security freeze for a protected consumer is removed in accordance with subsection (6) or (9) of this section, a consumer reporting agency may not release the protected consumer's consumer report, any information derived from the protected consumer's consumer report, or any record created for the protected consumer.

(5) A security freeze for a protected consumer placed in accordance with this section shall remain in effect until:

(a) The protected consumer or the protected consumer's representative requests the consumer reporting agency to remove the security freeze in accordance with subsection (6) of this section; or

(b) The security freeze is removed in accordance with subsection (9) of this section.

(6) If a protected consumer or a protected consumer's representative wishes to remove a security freeze for the protected consumer, the protected consumer or the protected consumer's representative shall:

(a) Submit a request for the removal of the security freeze to the consumer reporting agency at the address or other point of contact and in the manner specified by the consumer reporting agency;

(b) Provide to the consumer reporting agency:

(i) In the case of a request by the protected consumer:

(A) Proof that the sufficient proof of authority for the protected consumer's representative to act on behalf of the protected consumer is no longer valid; and

(B) Sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer; and

(ii) In the case of a request by the representative of a protected consumer:

(A) Sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer and the representative; and

(B) Sufficient proof of authority to act on behalf of the protected consumer.

(7) Within thirty days after receiving a request that meets the requirements of subsection (6) of this section, the consumer reporting agency shall remove the security freeze for the protected consumer.

(8) A consumer reporting agency may not charge a fee for any service performed under this section.

(9) A consumer reporting agency may remove a security freeze for a protected consumer or delete a record of a protected consumer if the security freeze was placed or the record was created based on a material misrepresentation of fact by the protected consumer or the protected consumer's representative.

(10) A violation of this section is enforced in accordance with RCW 19.182.170(17).

(11) This section does not apply to:

(a) Persons or transactions described in RCW 19.182.170(14)(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (h), or (i);

(b) Persons or transactions described in RCW 19.182.190;

(c) Persons or transactions described in RCW 19.182.200; or

(d) A person or entity that maintains, or a database used solely for, the following:

(i) Criminal record information;

(ii) Personal loss history information;

(iii) Fraud prevention or detection;

(iv) Employment screening; or

(v) Tenant screening.

[ 2018 c 54 s 2; 2016 c 135 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 135: See note following RCW 19.182.220.